Maryland, session 2026, HB0058.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
2–103.3.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0058*

HOUSE BILL 58
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “County” includes Baltimore City.
(3) “Elderly and handicapped person” means any person who, by reason of
illness, injury, age, congenital malfunction, or other permanent or temporary incapacity or
disability, is unable to use mass transit facilities and services as effectively as a person who
is not so affected.
(4) “Transportation service” means any transportation option or mix of
options that may include paratransit or fixed route service, established or employed by a
county to accommodate the transportation needs of its elderly and handicapped residents.
(b) (1) (i) Subject to subparagraphs (ii) through (iv) of this paragraph, the
Secretary shall identify separately within the Department’s annual budget an amount to
be used for elderly and handicapped transportation service in each county.
(2) The amount the Secretary identifies, or such other amount as may be
appropriated by the General Assembly for the provision of elderly and handicapped
transportation service in each county, shall be distributed as provided in subsections (c),
(d), and (e) of this section.
(c) (1) Of the amount separately identified or otherwise appropriated under
subsection (b) of this section, the Secretary shall:
(i) Allocate 60 percent equally among the counties; and
(ii) Allocate the remaining amount among the counties in proportion
to their respective percentages of the State’s combined elderly and handicapped population.
(2) Subject to the limitations provided in subsection (f) of this section, the
Secretary shall distribute all such allocated amounts to those counties which file a written
application with the Department in such form and detail as the Secretary requires.
(3) A written application submitted by a county under this subsection may
not be accepted or considered by the Secretary unless [the]:
(I) THE APPLICATION IDENTIFIES A COUNTY–ADMINISTERED
PARATRANSIT SERVICE THAT PROVIDES TRANSPORTATION FOR ELDERLY AND
HANDICAPPED RESIDENTS WITHIN DESIGNATED SERVICE AREAS, INCLUDING
INTERJURISDICTIONAL ROUTES BETWEEN COUNTIES AND THE FACILITIES WITHIN
THOSE COUNTIES IN THE FOLLOWING NETWORKS OF PROVIDERS:
1. ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE;
2. JOHNS HOPKINS MEDICINE;

HOUSE BILL 58 3
3. LIFEBRIDGE HEALTH;
4. LUMINIS HEALTH MARYLAND;
5. MEDSTAR HEALTH; AND
6. UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND MEDICAL SYSTEM; AND
(II) THE local area agency on aging certifies its approval of the
project for the funding for which the application is made.
(4) The Secretary shall consult with the Department of Aging and the
Department of Disabilities in distributing the funds available under this section.
(e) (1) If any of the allocated funds described in subsection (c) of this section
are not applied for by the counties within 6 months after the beginning of the fiscal year,
the Secretary shall make those funds available to counties pursuant to application
procedures and criteria developed by the Secretary, in consultation with the Department
of Aging and the Department of Disabilities. The criteria shall provide that:
(i) Such funds may be made available to counties in which the
Secretary determines that additional funds for transportation service to the elderly and
handicapped are most needed; and
(ii) Local match requirements described in subsection (f) of this
section shall apply to all disbursements.
(2) A written application submitted by a county under this subsection may
not be accepted or considered by the Secretary unless [the]:
(I) THE APPLICATION IDENTIFIES A COUNTY–ADMINISTERED
PARATRANSIT SERVICE THAT PROVIDES TRANSPORTATION FOR ELDERLY AND
HANDICAPPED RESIDENTS WITHIN DESIGNATED SERVICE AREAS, INCLUDING
INTERJURISDICTIONAL ROUTES BETWEEN COUNTIES AND THE FACILITIES WITHIN
THOSE COUNTIES IN THE FOLLOWING NETWORKS OF PROVIDERS:
1. ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE;
2. JOHNS HOPKINS MEDICINE;
3. LIFEBRIDGE HEALTH;
4. LUMINIS HEALTH MARYLAND;

HOUSE BILL 58
5. MEDSTAR HEALTH; AND
6. UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND MEDICAL SYSTEM; AND
(II) THE local area agency on aging certifies its approval of the
project for the funding for which the application is made.
(g) The Secretary, in consultation with the Department of Aging and the
Department of Disabilities, shall develop procedures for the proper enforcement of this
section. The procedures shall provide that:
(1) A county shall use all amounts distributed to it under this section only
for the acquisition or replacement of equipment or for the operating costs of the county’s
transportation service;
(2) A county, in consultation with the local area agency on aging, shall
determine the most effective means of serving the transportation needs of its elderly and
handicapped residents;
(3) Each county shall cooperate with the [others] OTHER COUNTIES to
best serve the transportation needs of the State’s elderly and handicapped residents,
INCLUDING BY ESTABLISHING INTERJURISDICTIONAL PARATRANSIT SERVICE
ROUTES BETWEEN COUNTIES AND THE FACILITIES WITHIN THOSE COUNTIES IN THE
FOLLOWING NETWORKS OF PROVIDERS:
(I) ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE;
(II) JOHNS HOPKINS MEDICINE;
(III) LIFEBRIDGE HEALTH;
(IV) LUMINIS HEALTH MARYLAND;
(V) MEDSTAR HEALTH; AND
(VI) UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND MEDICAL SYSTEM; and
(4) A county administering a transportation service that receives funds
under this section:
(i) Shall provide trips for any purpose;
(ii) Shall serve the elderly and handicapped citizens within the
service areas identified in its application, INCLUDING THROUGH
INTERJURISDICTIONAL PARATRANSIT SERVICE ROUTES BETWEEN COUNTIES AND

HOUSE BILL 58 5
THE FACILITIES WITHIN THOSE COUNTIES IN THE FOLLOWING NETWORKS OF
PROVIDERS:
1. ADVENTIST HEALTHCARE;
2. JOHNS HOPKINS MEDICINE;
3. LIFEBRIDGE HEALTH;
4. LUMINIS HEALTH MARYLAND;
5. MEDSTAR HEALTH; AND
6. UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND MEDICAL SYSTEM;
(iii) May not restrict its transportation service to clients of social
service agencies;
(iv) May establish reasonable fares; and
(v) May permit persons other than the elderly and handicapped to
use or benefit from its transportation service to the extent capacity is available.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.